Colorado statutes. TITLE 7 Corporations and Associations
PART 12
FEES

7-62-1201. Fees for filing documents and certificates - other charges. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 452, § 1, effective November 1.

L. 83:

Entire section R&RE, p. 873, § 32, effective July 1.

L. 98:

(2) amended, p. 1322, § 17, effective June 1.

L. 2000:

(1)(c) and (1)(d) amended, p. 953, § 25, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

Entire section repealed, p. 1861, § 163, effective July 1; entire section repealed, p. 1728, § 163, effective October 1.